Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202045-901
Act, how cited.

Sections 45-901 to 45-931 shall be known and may be cited as the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 36;

Laws 2012, LB269, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB194, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB909, § 35.
November 14, 2020